Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1167.
do enact as follows:AB1167,11Section 1. 196.20 (10) of the statutes is created to read:AB1167,2,32196.20 (10) An electric public utility may not recover in rates any amount for 3the rate of return on equity for a retired electric generating facility.AB1167,24Section 2. 196.491 (3) (L) of the statutes is created to read:AB1167,2,115196.491 (3) (L) The commission shall create and maintain a web page on its 6website that displays for every application submitted under this subsection the 7procedural status of the application and the procedural status of any other permit 8or approval necessary for the applicant to construct the facility for which the 9application was submitted, including permits or approvals granted by the federal 10government, permits or approvals granted by an agency, as defined in s. 13.172 (1), 11and permits or approvals granted by a city, village, town, or county.AB1167,312Section 3. 196.491 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1167,3,713196.491 (4) (b) 2. The person shows to the satisfaction of the commission that 1the person reasonably anticipates, at the time that construction of the equipment or 2facilities commences, that on each day that the equipment and facilities are in 3operation the person will consume no less than 70 percent of the aggregate kilowatt 4hours output from the equipment and facilities in manufacturing processes for 5nonresidential purposes at the site where the equipment and facilities are located 6or in ferrous mineral mining and processing activities governed by subch. III of ch. 7295 at the site where the equipment and facilities are located.AB1167,48Section 4. 196.491 (4) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB1167,3,119196.491 (4) (b) 3. If the equipment or facilities are expected to be 10interconnected with a public utility’s electric infrastructure, the person agrees to 11pay all costs associated with interconnecting the equipment or facilities.AB1167,512Section 5. Initial applicability.AB1167,3,1513(1) Certificate of public convenience and necessity permit dashboard. 14The treatment of s. 196.491 (3) (L) first applies to an application submitted on the 15effective date of this subsection.AB1167,3,1616